Tennessee, session 114, SB2211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-904(b), is amended by deleting
the language "at least seven (7) days prior to the date set for such meeting" and substituting "at
least ten (10) days prior to the date set for such meeting".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to contracts, leases, and lease-purchase agreements executed, renewed, modified,
or extended on or after such date.
SB2211
012567
- 1 -